Louisiana, session 2026, HB606.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:210(3), (4), and (5), 210.3, 210.4(2), and 210.6(A)(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:210(introductory paragraph) and 210.1(C) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§210. Definitions
The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this Subpart:
* * *
(3) "Nonpedestrian area" shall consist of any bicycle lane, shoulder, or side
of a divided highway, highway, roadway, or street where the posted speed limit is
thirty-five fifty-five miles per hour or less.
(4) "Pedestrian area" means a sidewalk, crosswalk, school crosswalk, school
crossing zone, or safety zone, parking lot, or any similar area.
(5) "Personal delivery device" means a powered device that travels at the
speed of twenty miles per hour or less, is less than five hundred pounds, excluding
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 606 ENROLLED
cargo, is manufactured for transporting cargo and goods in a pedestrian area,
nonpedestrian area, or supplementary areas, and is equipped with automated driving
technology, including software and hardware, that enables the operation of the
device with the remote support and supervision of a human being.
§210.1. Applicable law
* * *
C. A personal delivery device shall have the same legal rights and duties
applicable to a pedestrian or bicyclist in the same circumstances, except for those
duties that, by their nature cannot apply to a personal delivery device, or those that
would unreasonably burden the operation of the personal delivery device.
* * *
§210.3. Device operation
A personal delivery device operated under this Subpart shall: A business
entity may operate a personal delivery device in any pedestrian or nonpedestrian area
of the state, provided the device:
(1) Operate in a manner that complies with any provision under this Chapter
that is applicable to pedestrians, unless the provision cannot apply to the device.
(2) (1) Yield Yields to or does not obstruct the right-of-way to all other
lawful traffic, including pedestrian traffic.
(3) (2) Not Does not unreasonably interfere with other traffic, including
pedestrian traffic.
(4) Display the lights required by R.S. 32:301 et seq., if the personal delivery
device is operated at night.
(5) (3) Comply Complies with any applicable regulations adopted by local
authority, provided those regulations are not inconsistent with this Subpart.
(6) (4) Not Does not transport hazardous materials regulated under the
Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, pursuant to 49 U.S.C. 5103 and required
to be placarded under 49 CFR Part 172, Subpart F.
(7) (5) Be Is monitored or controlled by an agent of the business entity
meeting the requirements of R.S. 32:210.2(A).
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 606 ENROLLED
§210.4. Areas of Operation
A personal delivery device operated under this Subpart may be operated
either:
* * *
(2) At a speed not to exceed twenty miles per hour in a nonpedestrian area,
provided that the personal delivery device shall not cross any divided highway,
highway, roadway, or street with a posted speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles
per hour at an intersection.
* * *
§210.6. Local authority regulation
A.(1) Personal delivery devices may be prohibited regulated by local
resolutions or ordinances if the local government determines that the prohibition
regulation is in the interest of public safety and is not inconsistent with this Subpart.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.